North Carolina statutes. Chapter 91A. Pawnbrokers and Cash Converters Modernization Act.
§§ 91A-1 through 91A-14.

Recodified as Part 1 of Article 45 of Chapter 66,

G.S. 66-385

through 66-399, by Session Laws 2012-46, s. 2, effective October 1, 2012.

This Chapter was recodified as Part 1 of Article 45 of Chapter 66 by Session Laws , effective October 1, 2012, and applicable to offenses committed on or after that date. Editor’s Note. 2012-46, s. 2 The following table shows G.S. sections from former Chapter 91A, and their comparable, new Chapter 66, Article 45, Part 1 numbers. Former Present Former Present Section Section Section Section 91A-1 66-385 91A-8 66-393 91A-2 66-386 91A-9 66-394 91A-3 66-387 91A-10 66-395 91A-4 66-388 91A-11 66-396 91A-5 66-389 91A-12 66-397 91A-6 66-390 91A-13 66-398 91A-7 66-391 91A-14 66-399 91A-7.1 66-392

Click to view